California, session 20252026, AB498.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 21712 of the Business and Professions Code is amended to read:21712. (a) Each contract for the rental or lease of individual storage space in a self-service storage facility shall be in writing and shall contain, in addition to the provisions otherwise required or permitted by law to be included, a statement that the occupant’s property will be subject to a claim of lien and may even be sold to satisfy the lien if the rent or other charges due remain unpaid for 14 consecutive days and that those actions are authorized by this chapter.(b) The provisions of this chapter shall not apply, and the lien authorized by this chapter shall not attach, unless the rental agreement requests, and provides space for, the occupant to give the name and mailing or email address of another person to whom the preliminary lien notice and subsequent notices required to be given under this chapter may be sent. Notices sent pursuant to Section 21703 or 21705 shall be sent to the occupant’s address and the alternative address, if both addresses are provided by the occupant. Failure of an occupant to provide an alternative address shall not affect an owner’s remedies under this chapter or under any other law.(c) (1) The owner may send the notices required by Sections 21703 and 21705 to the occupant and to the alternative address specified in subdivision (b) by email only if both of the following conditions are met:(A) The rental agreement states that lien notices may be sent to the occupant and to the alternate by email.(B) The occupant provides a written signature on the rental agreement consenting to receive lien notices by email.(2) An owner may demonstrate actual delivery and receipt by any of the following:(A) The occupant acknowledges receipt of the electronic transmission of the document by executing an electronic signature, which is defined as an electronic sound, symbol, or process attached to, or logically associated with, an electronic record and executed or adopted by a person with the intent to sign the electronic record.(B) The document is delivered to the occupant’s email address, and there is evidence demonstrating that the occupant downloaded, printed, viewed, opened, or otherwise acknowledged receipt of the document.(C) The document is transmitted to the occupant through an application on an internet website that is secured by password, biometric identifier, or other technology, and there is evidence demonstrating that the occupant logged into the application and viewed or otherwise acknowledged receipt of the document.(D) The occupant acknowledges receipt of the electronic transmission of the document by replying to the email communication, and there is delivery path evidence that the reply email was sent from the occupant’s email address.(3) If the owner is unable to demonstrate actual delivery and receipt pursuant to paragraph (2), the owner shall resend the notice by mail to the occupant’s last known mailing address in the manner originally specified by the underlying provisions of Section 21703 or 21705.